<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88719-0056 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-19-88.f2.A1055</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="61"/><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="41">[C-475-702]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Final Negative Countervailing Duty Determination; Certain GraniteProducts From Italy</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Import Administration, International Trade Administration,Commerce.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>We determine that <T3>de minimis </T3>countervailable benefits are being provided to manufacturers,producers or exporters in Italy of certain granite products as describedin the ``Scope of Investigation'' section of this notice. Since the estimatednet subsidy is either <T3>de minimis </T3>or zero for all manufacturers, producers or exportersin Italy of certain granite products, our determination is negative.We have notified the U.S. International Trade Commission (ITC) of our determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>July 19, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mark Linscott, Lori Cooper orBarbara Tillman, Office of Investigations, Import Administration, InternationalTrade Administration, U.S. Department of Commerce, 14th Street and ConstitutionAvenue NW., Washington, DC 20230; telephone: (202) 377-8330, 377-8320 or377-2438.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Final Determination</ITAG>Based on our investigation, we determine that <T3>de minimis </T3>countervailable benefits are being provided to manufacturers,producers or exporters in Italy of certain granite products. For purposesof this investigation, the following programs are found to confer subsidies:andbullet; Preferential Transportation Ratesandbullet; Interest Rebates on Conversion Loans from the European Coal andSteel Community (ECSC)andbullet; Reductions in Social Security Payments for Companies Located inthe Mezzogiornoandbullet; Tax Concessions under Law 614.We determine the estimated net subsidy under these programs to be <T3>de minimis </T3>or zero for all manufacturers, producers or exportersin Italy of certain granite products.<ITAG tagnum="84">Case History</ITAG>Since the publication of the preliminary determination [<T3>Preliminary Negative Countervailing Duty Determination: Certain GraniteProducts from Italy </T3>(52 FR 48732, December 24, 1987)] (<T3>Certain Granite</T3>), the following events have occurred. On December30, 1987, petitioner requested an extension of the final determinationto correspond with the final determination in the concurrent antidumpingduty investigation of certain granite products from Italy. On January 28,1988, we published the extension notice (53 FR 2521). On March 2, 1988,respondents requested a postponement of the final antidumping duty determinationfrom May 9, 1988, to June 20, 1988. On March 15, 1988, we published a postponementnotice (53 FR 8479, March 15, 1988). On June 2, 1988, respondents requestedanother postponement of the final determination in the antidumping dutyinvestigation to July 13, 1988. This postponement notice was publishedon June 15, 1988 (53 FR 22369).The Government of Italy (GOI) and respondent companies submitted supplementalquestionnaire responses on the following dates: January 28, 29, February1, 2, and March 29, 1988.From April 5 to May 2, 1988, we conducted verification in Italy of thequestionnaire responses of the GOI and the following respondent companies:Campolonghi and related companies Freda and Olympia Marmi, Euromarble,Henraux and related company Giuseppe Furrer, Pisani, Fratelli Guarda, Bonotti,Antolini Luigi, Granitex, Margraf, Marcolini Marmi and Cremar.Amended responses based on information reviewed at verification were submittedby the GOI on May 19, 1988, and by the respondent companies on June 15and 16, 1988. None of the interested parties requested a public hearing;however, initial case briefs were filed by petitioner, respondent companiesand the GOI on June 2, 1988. The parties filed rebuttal briefs on June10. Comments on verification were filed by the GOI on June 13, 1988. Petitionerfiled its rebuttal to the GOI's verification comments on July 7, 1988.On May 31, 1988, we served a supplemental questionnaire on the Commissionof the European Communities (EC), the GOI and the respondent companiesconcerning EC-sourced loan programs. We received responses on June 14 and15, 1988, and we conducted verification of the EC response from June 29to July 1, 1988, in Luxembourg. We received initial briefs on the EC verificationon July 7, 1988, and reply briefs on July 8, 1988, from petitioner andrespondents. The Commission of the EC submitted factual corrections tothe EC verification report on July 7, 1988.<ITAG tagnum="84">Scope of Investigation</ITAG>The products covered by this investigation are certain granite productsfrom Italy. Certain granite products are \3/8\ inch (1 cm) to 2\1/2\ inches(6.34 cm) in thickness and include the following: Rough-sawed granite slabs;face-finished granite slabs; and finished dimensional granite including,but not limited to, building facing, flooring, wall and floor tiles, paving,and crypt fronts. Certain granite products do not include monumental stones,crushed granite, or curbing. Certain granite products are currently classifiedunder <T3>TSUSA </T3>item number 513.7400 and under <T3>HS </T3>item numbers 2516.12.00, 6802.23.00 and 6802.93.00.<ITAG tagnum="84">Exclusion Requests</ITAG>As discussed in <T3>Certain Granite, </T3>the largest companies comprising 60 percent ofthe value of exports of the subject merchandise to the United States in1986 (our review period) requested exclusion from any possible countervailingduty order which might result from this investigation, claiming not tohave benefitted from countervailable subsidies. Following our standardpractice, we required the GOI to certify that those companies requestingexclusion either did not use any of the programs under investigation orreceived only <T3>de minimis </T3>benefits under these programs. Based on the responsesand the government's certification, we preliminarily determined that thosecompanies producing and exporting the subject merchandise which requestedexclusion would have qualified for exclusion from any eventual countervailingduty order. However, since we preliminarily determined that manufacturersand exporters of Italian granite do not receive subsidies, based on theresponses of firms not requesting exclusion, we did not need to reach theissue of exclusion.While verifying the GOI's responses, we also verified the government'scertification of the exclusion requests. We verified that the certificationwas essentially accurate in all respects and that the government correctlycertified that no exclusion company received benefits that were cumulativelyabove <T3>de minimis. </T3>During this verification and the verification of theresponses of the companies requesting exclusion, we discovered a few minordiscrepancies which are described in the verification report. However,these discrepancies in the government certification were insignificantin nature and were not sufficient to raise any company requesting exclusionabove the <T3>de minimis </T3>level. Accordingly, we would determine that those companiesthat requested exclusion and are producers and exporters of the subjectmerchandise would qualify for exclusion. However, we find that the situationhere is identical to that in our preliminary determination. Because theestimated net subsidy for respondent companies that did not request exclusionis <T3>de minimis, </T3>no final order will be issued and the exclusion provisiondoes not apply.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Programs</ITAG>For purposes of this final determination, the period for which we are measuringsubsidization is calendar year 1986 (the review period), which correspondsto the fiscal year of all but one of the respondent companies.At the outset of this investigation, the GOI identified the largest producersand exporters of certain granite products that accounted for at least 60percent of exports of the subject merchandise to the United States duringthe review period. These companies subsequently requested exclusion andthe government certified these exclusion requests. We then informed theGOI that, by requesting exclusion, these companies had set themselves ona separate investigative track, necessitating our choosing a new representativegroup of companies consisting of the largest producers and exporters accountingfor 60 percent of the remaining pool of exports to the United States. Inresponse, the GOI identified twelve additional companies, and we sent questionnairesto ten of these companies.In countervailing duty investigations, it is our practice to calculatea country-wide rate which is an average rate for all companies whose individualrates for all countervailable programs combined are neither <T3>de minimis </T3>nor significantly different from rates for other companies.Since no respondent company's individual rate is above <T3>de minimis, </T3>we have not calculated country-wide rates for thoseprograms determined to be countervailable.Based upon our analysis of the petition, the responses to our questionnaires,verification, and written comments from respondents and petitioner, wedetermine the following:<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Programs Determined To Confer Subsidies</ITAG>We determine that subsidies are being provided to manufacturers, producersor exporters in Italy of certain granite products under the following programs:A. Preferential Transportation RatesPetitioner alleges that manufacturers, producers and exporters of certaingranite products in Italy receive preferential transportation rates fromFerrovie dello Stato (the Italian state railway system).The provisions set forth in Article 19 of Law 887 establish reduced railrates for raw mineral substances produced and processed in the Italianislands. There are two levels of incentives available under Article 19:For raw mineral substances mined or extracted in the Italian islands, thenormal tariff rates are reduced by 30 percent; for the same substancesthat are further processed on the islands, the rates are reduced by 60percent.According to the text of Law 887, raw mineral substances are the only productseligible for preferential rail rates. However, it does not specify a listof qualifying raw mineral substances and we could verify only that oil,clay, marble and granite, among other substances, are included within thedefinition of raw mineral substances.The normal railway rates to which the reductions are applied are calculatedbased on the weight, distance, and tariff classification of the shippedproducts. For shipments from the islands, the calculation includes thedistance covered by the state-run ferries, which are used to transportthe rail cars across the water. The reductions are automatically appliedto qualifying shipments of raw mineral substances by state rail officials.In our preliminary determination we stated that, based on information submittedto the Department by the GOI and respondent companies, none of the respondentcompanies received benefits under this program. However, at the companyverifications and after the government verification, we were informed forthe first time that, during the review period, three respondent companiesreceived 30 percent discounts from Ferrovie dello Stato for rail shipmentsof granite blocks from Sardinia to the Italian mainland.No information provided to us during verification indicated what industries,in fact, ship qualifying substances from the Italian islands, or even whatmaterials specifically fall under the definition of raw mineral substanceswithin the meaning of Law 887. Based on the limited information submittedon the record of this investigation, we determine that granite producersare one group of a limited number of industrial groups in the Italian economythat purchase the raw mineral substances for which preferential rates underLaw 887 are granted, and, therefore, that these special rates are limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,within the meaning of section 771(5)(B) of the Act.Of the respondent companies, we verified that only Henraux, Antolini Luigiand Cremar received reductions in transportation rates during the reviewperiod. To calculate the benefit to these companies under this program,we took the difference between the price they would have paid absent the30 percent reduction and the price they actually paid with the reductionfor shipments of granite and allocated this amount over total granite salesduring the review period. This resulted in an estimated net subsidy ofless than 0.0001 percent <T3>ad valorem </T3>for Henraux, 0.04 percent <T3>ad valorem </T3>for Cremar, and 0.30 percent <T3>ad valorem </T3>for Antolini Luigi. The <T3>ad valorem </T3>rate is zero for all others.B. Interest Rebates on Conversion Loans From the European Coal and SteelCommunity (ECSC)Although not alleged by the petitioner, we investigated this program becauseit was discovered during the course of the company verifications.Article 56(2)(b) of the Treaty of Paris, which created the ECSC, authorizesECSC aid to ``activities capable of reabsorbing redundant [ECSC] workersinto productive employment.'' A council decision published in the <T3>Official Journal of the European Communities, </T3>No. C 178 of July27, 1977, authorized conversion loans for projects that involve, or arelikely to involve, reemployment of redundant ECSC workers. Directorate General-18 (DG-18), the office of the Commission of the EuropeanCommunities that administers these loans, may finance up to 50 percentof the costs associated with a qualifying investment. An applicant mustbe a small- or medium-sized enterprise, defined as an enterprise that:(1) Employs less than 500 people; (2) has net fixed assets of less than75 million European Currency Units (ECUs); and (3) has no parent enterprisethat owns more than one-third of its share capital. A qualifying projectmust create new positions that are capable of being filled by coal andsteel workers.We verified that loans are available and have been disbursed to companiesin virtually every manufacturing and service industry. We also verifiedthat no region of a member country is excluded from receipt of conversionloans. However, interest rebates associated with these loans are determinedbased on regional location. For firms located in ``priority'' regions thathave suffered high unemployment in the coal and steel industries, the interestrebate is granted whether or not a qualifying firm actually employs redundantECSC workers. A five percent interest rebate is granted for the portionof loan principal equal to (a) the number of new positions created, multipliedby (b) two-thirds, multiplied by (c) 20,000 ECUs per worker. In contrast,firms located outside ``priority'' regions must hire redundant ECSC workers.Their five percent interest rebate applies only to a portion of the loanequal to the proportion of newly-created positions actually filled by redundantECSC workers multiplied by 20,000 ECUs.We verified that Fratelli Guarda, the only respondent company that receiveda conversion loan, is located in a ``priority'' region and that it receivedan interest rebate for a loan that was outstanding during the review period.We also verified that it filled no newly-created position with a redundantECSC worker. If Fratelli Guarda were located outside a ``priority'' region,it would not have qualified for an interest rebate. Therefore, we determinethat this rebate is countervailable because receipt was dependent on locationin a specifically designated ``priority'' region.To calculate the benefit under this program, we divided the total valueof rebates received by Fratelli Guarda during the review period by itstotal sales of all products during the review period and arrived at anestimated net subsidy of 0.10 percent <T3>ad valorem for Fratelli Guarda. </T3>The <T3>ad Valorem </T3>rate is zero for all others.C. Reductions in Social Security Payments Under the Cassa per il MezzogiornoProgramPetitioner alleges that manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italyof certain granite products receive benefits under the following MezzogiornoRegional Assistance Programs: (1) National corporate tax exemptions; (2)local corporate tax exemptions; (3) capital grants; (4) interest rate reductions;and (5) reductions in social security payments. We verified that the firstfour programs were not used by the respondent companies (<T3>see </T3>section III.C. of this notice). The last program, reductionsin social security payments, is discussed below.According to the government's responses, all Italian companies that operatefacilities in the Mezzogiorno region of Italy are entitled to a ten percentreduction in social security payments owed to the National Social SecurityInstitute (INPS) for all workers employed in this region. The reductionmay be increased to 20 percent for any additional employees hired afterSeptember 30, 1968, over and above the number of individuals employed bythe company on that date. For staff employed between July 1, 1976, andDecember 31, 1980, there was a total exemption from payments owed to theINPS, up to December 31, 1986.Because benefits under this program are available only to firms that locatefacilities in the Mezzogiorno, we determine that this program is limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,within the meaning of the Act and, therefore, is countervailable.We verified that only Henraux received reductions in social security paymentsduring the review period for employees at stockyards it owns in the Mezzogiorno.Henraux filed a timely request for exclusion and was certified by the Governmentof Italy as having received only <T3>de minimis </T3>benefits under this program.To calculate the benefit under this program, we divided the total valueof the social security reductions Henraux received during the review periodby its total sales of all products during the review period and arrivedat an estimated net subsidy of 0.08 percent <T3>ad valorem </T3>for Henraux. The <T3>Ad valorem </T3>rate is zero for all others.D. Tax Concessions Under Law 614  Article 30 of Law 614 provides for reductions in local corporate incometax (ILOR) rates to small- and medium-sized Italian companies that establishor expand facilities in designated depressed territories of northern andcentral Italy. ILOR is one component of a company's overall national corporatetax liability; and other component is the national corporate tax, IRPEG.Both IRPEG and ILOR are imposed and collected by the national government;however ILOR revenues are redistributed to local areas based on need andother criteria, without regard to the amount collected from a given locality. If an enterprise is newly established, the total amount of the company'sincome is exempt from the ILOR tax. For firms expanding their productivefacilities, the ILOR exemption applies only to income derived as a resultof the expansion. Reductions may be claimed for ten years following theestablishment or expansion of a facility.  Law 614 was terminated for most regions on December 31, 1985. It was laterreinstated under Law 879 until December 21, 1990, exclusively for two depressedterritories devastated be earthquakes: Friuli-Venezia Giulia and Marche.Residual benefits under Law 614 may continue for ten years following expiration. Because this program is available only to firms that invest in designatedareas of northern and central Italy, we determine that it is limited toa specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,within the meaning of the Act and, therefore, is countervailable.  Based on our review of certified tax returns for all respondent companies,we verified that only Granitex claimed a reduction in taxes under thisprogram on the tax return filed during the review period. We calculatedthe benefits under this program based on the company's overall corporateincome tax liability for the year in which the tax return was filed. Weincluded in this calculation the net effect on Granitex's national corporatetax (IRPEG) liability, because both ILOR and IRPEG are part of a company'soverall national tax liability. We first determined the difference betweenwhat Granitex paid in ILOR and IRPEG during the review period and whatit would have paid absent this program. We then divided this amount bythe total sales of Granitex during this period. Based on this calculation,we arrived at an estimated net subsidy of 0.36 percent <T3>ad valorem</T3> for Granitex. The <T3>ad valorem</T3> rate for all others is zero.  <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Programs Determined Not To Confer a Subsidy  </ITAG>We determine that subsidies are not being provided to manufacturers, producersor exporters in Italy of certain granite products under the following programs: A. Interest Rate Reductions Under Decree 902 of 1976  Petitioner alleges that manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italyof certain granite products receive loans under Decree 902 of 1976 thatare limited in availability and that are received on terms inconsistentwith commercial considerations. In its responses, the GOI stated that Decree902 offers loans to firms located in all regions of Italy and involvedin all types of production activity.  During verification, we reviewed the legislative structure that implementedthis program. Decree 902 was issued pursuant to Law 183 of May 2, 1976.Article 15 of Law 183 authorized the establishment of a national fund topromote industrialization and modernization in northern, central and southernItaly. Decree 902 divides administration of the loan program, which offersreductions in interest rates, between the Ministry of Industry and Commerce(MIC), which has authority to disburse loans to firms in northern and centralItaly under Title II, and the Cassa per il Mezzogiorno (the MezzogiornoAgency), which has similar authority for firms in southern Italy underTitle III.  As originally enacted, Decree 902 authorized the maximum interest ratereduction for firms located in either southern Italy or in areas designatedas insufficiently developed in northern and central Italy. For these firms,the reduced rate was equal to 40 percent of the ``reference rate,'' a conglomerateof commercial interest rates in Italy compiled monthly by the Bank of Italy.The minimum benefit, equal to 60 percent of the reference rate, was availableto firms located in the remaining areas of northern and central Italy.In 1981, these benefits were changed by ministerial decree to an interestrate of 36 percent of the reference rate for firms in southern Italy, 48percent for firms in insufficiently developed areas of central Italy and72 percent for firms in the remaining areas of central Italy and all areasof northern Italy. In 1986, the rates in effect were 50 percent of thereference rate for southern Italy and 60 percent for northern and centralItaly.  The determine whether any countervailable benefits were provided to manufacturers,producers and exporters in Italy of certain granite products, we examinedthe availability and use of 902 benefits by Italian firms.  Together, Articles Five, Six and Eight of Title II and Article 12 of TitleIII offer benefits to all companies in all areas of Italy. There are noprovisions in Decree 902 that limit availability of benefits to particulartypes of production activities. The only restrictions set forth in Decree902 are capitalization ceilings, as the program is designed for small-and medium-sized firms, and project requirements. Firms located in southernItaly and in insufficiently developed areas of central and northern Italymay receive loans for modernization, expansion or new construction of productionfacilities, while firms located in the remaining areas of central and northernItaly qualify for modernization of existing facilities.  We verified that, since 1980, loans under decree 902 have been awardedto virtually every productive sector in Italy. In each year between 1980and 1987, all 17 categories of Italian manufacturing industries, as definedby the Istituto Centrale di Statistica, received 902 loans. These categoriesinclude: food; textiles; leather; woodworking; metallurgical; mechanical;non-metallic mineral; plastic products; consumer products repair; mineralextraction; apparel and furnishings; steel; chemical; rubber; paper andpaper products; printing and publishing; and other manufacturing. We alsoverified that the non-metallic mineral grouping, in which granite productionis categorized, received neither a dominant nor a disproportionate shareof loans in any of these years. In addition, we verified that Law 902 loanshave been awarded in every region of Italy but at differing interest rates,depending upon the region.In past cases <T3>(e.g., Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: CertainFresh Atlantic Groundfish from Canada </T3>(51 FR 10041, 10045, March 24,1986)) <T3>(Groundfish from Canada), </T3>where the level of benefits under aparticular program was tiered, <T3>i.e., </T3>varied between regions, but the tiers together covered allregions of the country, we calculated countervailable benefits based onany additional benefits received over and above the lowest tier of benefitsthat was available under the program. We reasoned that, when a tiered programis available in every region of the country, the lowest level of benefitsis not limited, so long as the minimum level of benefits has been receivedby more than a group of enterprises or industries.We verified that Giuseppe Furrer and Ronchi Marmi, the only two producersof certain granite products to have received Decree 902 loans, were neverlocated in southern Italy or in insufficiently developed areas of northernand central Italy, and that these two companies received only the minimumbenefit that was available.Because the manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italy of certaingranite products received only the lowest level of benefits under Decree902, and we verified that the lowest level of benefits has been receivedby more than a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprisesor industries, and by companies in all regions of Italy, we determine thatthe minimum level of benefits received by these companies is not countervailable.B. Contributions for Purchases of Electronic Equipment Under Law 696Under Law 696 of December 19, 1983, small- and medium-sized Italian companiesengaged in production activities could apply for a contribution from theMIC toward the price of certain electronic machinery. This program wasnot alleged by petitioner but was discovered in reviewing the financialstatements of the respondent companies. Under this program, a contributionof 32 percent of the price of the machinery is available to firms operatingin the Mezzogiorno region. The remaining areas of Italy are eligible toreceive a 25 percent contribution.During verification we reviewed the criteria set forth in the law and theprocedure developed by MIC to administer this program. The following eligibilitycriteria must be met by a firm applying for a Law 696 contribution: (1)It must have no greater than 300 employees; (2) it must have a net investedcapital of less than L. 12 billion in 1986; (3) it must be a manufacturing,mining, artisan or crafts enterprise; (4) the application filed with MICmust be for the purchase of electronically-controlled machines; and (5)the application must have been submitted to MIC on or before April 30,1985, for machinery ordered between December 21, 1983 and March 31, 1985.Law 696 provisions for contributions toward the purchase of electronicmachinery were terminated on December 29, 1984 for all applications postmarkedafter April 30, 1985. MIC is still in the process of processing and approvingapplications filed prior to this deadline.In our preliminary determination, we stated that additional informationwas needed to determine whether Law 696 conferred subsidies on the manufacture,production or exportation of certain granite products from Italy. In orderto determine if the provision of Law 696 contributions constitutes a countervailablesubsidy, we must determine if the benefits provided are limited to a specificenterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries, in accordancewith section 771(5)(B) of the Act.The text of Law 696 states that a 25 percent contribution is availableto Italian firms in the mining and manufacturing sectors as well as artisanor crafts enterprises. The contribution is increased to 32 percent forfirms operating in the Mezzogiorno. We verified that none of the respondentcompanies received Law 696 contributions at the 32 percent level duringthe operation of the program. Several of the respondent companies receivedcontributions of 25 percent.At verification we reviewed the sectors that received Law 696 contributionsduring the 18 months of its existence. We confirmed that contributionshave been awarded to thousands of companies throughout Italy representinga variety of industries and a wide range of products. Law 696 contributionshave been approved and disbursed to companies in virtually all manufacturingsectors, including mineral extraction, food, textiles, steel, metallurgicalwork, chemicals, rubber, plastic products, paper and paper products, printingand publishing, consumer goods, leather, wood, mechanical products, non-metallicmineral processing and industrial construction and installation. We alsoverified that non-metallic minerals processing, the industrial group inwhich granite production falls, received neither a dominant nor a disproportionateshare of Law 696 benefits.As discussed in section II.A., above, where the level of benefits undera particular program is tiered, <T3>i.e., </T3>varies between regions, but the tiers together covered allregions of the country, we calculate countervailable benefits based onlyon any additional benefits received over and above the lowest tier of benefitsavailable under the program. When a tiered program is available in everyregion of a country, the lowest level of benefits is not limited, so longas the minimum level of benefits has been utilized by more than a groupof enterprises or industries.Because we verified that the respondent companies received only the minimum25 percent contribution for purchases of electronically-controlled machineryunder Law 696 and that this benefit has been granted to more than a specificenterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries, we determinethat the minimum level of rebate awarded to these companies is not countervailable.C. Loans From Italian Special Credit Institutions Petitioner alleges that medium- and long-term loans disbursed by Italianspecial credit institutions, also known as medium- and long-term creditinstitutions (MLTs), to manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italyof certain granite products confer countervailable benefits. Petitionerargues that these institutions are either financed or directed by the GOIand, therefore, this all medium- and long-term loans from them are countervailable.During verification, we met with officials of Istituto Mobiliare Italiano(IMI) and an official of Mediocredito Toscano. Both institutions are MLTsand are authorized by law to engage in medium- and long-term lending. Thereare approximately 40 to 50 MLTs in Italy. Most of these institutions wereestablished pursuant to Law 445 of 1952 and they derive their lending authoritypursuant to this law. Except in very limited circumstances, only MLTs areauthorized to disburse loans of more than 18 months. The government ownsshares in many MLTs; 50 percent of IMI is owned by Cassa Depositi, which,in turn, is owned by the Ministry of Treasury. In contrast, MediocreditoToscano has no direct government ownership. We verified that all MLTs disburse two separate and distinct forms of medium-and long-term credit: (1) Loans that carry interest rate reductions underspecific government programs and (2) commercial loans that are not mandatedor funded by government programs. By reviewing all loan contracts for eachrespondent company, we were able to identify those loan transactions inwhich the government intervened in the form of interest rate reductionsunder specific programs (<T3>e.g., </T3>Decree 902) and those which involved no government intervention.At each company, we confirmed that a loan contract pursuant to a governmentloan program always identifies the loan program and, if relevant, containsprovisions which prescribe the interest rate reduction, such as the reductionavailable under Decree 902 which is calculated as a certain percentageof the reference rate (<T3>see</T3> discussion of ``Interest Rate Reductions under Decree 902of 1976'' in section II.A. above). We found no evidence that those loans,for which the loan contracts specify no government program, are disbursedon any basis other than a commercial one. As we stated in the <T3>Final Negative Countervailing Duty Determination: Carbon Steel WireRod from Singapore</T3> (53 FR 16304, May 6, 1988), ``[G]overnment ownershipor control of a bank does not necessarily lead to the conclusion that thebank is operating in other than a commercial fashion.'' Based on informationobtained during verification, we confirmed that agencies of the GOI ownshares, at varying proportions, in many deposit banks which lend short-term,and in MLTs. All MLTs, whether government-owned in part or not, act onbehalf of the government in disbursing loans with interest rate reductionsunder specific government programs.The bulk of their lending, however,involves no government intervention.We examined the commercial nature of MLT lending that is not tied to government-fundedprograms by comparing interest rates on loans disbursed by one MLT, IMI,that has significant government ownership and those disbursed by another,Mediocredito Toscano, that has no government ownership. We found that,for loans disbursed simultaneously and on comparable terms, the interestrates were also comparable. Accordingly, we determine that medium- andlong-term lending by MLTs, in which the GOI has direct or indirect ownership,that involves no government program does not confer countervailable subsidieson manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italy of certain granite products.D. Interest Contributions Under the Sabatini Law Although not alleged by the petitioner, we investigated this program becausethe company questionnaire responses indicated that several firms benefittedunder the Sabatini Law during the review period. In our preliminary determination,we stated that we needed additional information in order to determine whetherthis program confers subsidies on the manufacture, production or exportationof certain granite products from Italy. The Sabatini Law was enacted in 1965 to encourage the sale of machine toolsand production machinery. It provides for deferred payment of up to fiveyears on installment contracts for the purchase of such equipment and fora one-time, lump sum contribution from Medicredito Centrale (MC), the administeringagency, toward the interest owned by the buyer of such equipment on theinstallment contracts.Under the Sabatini Law, a buyer of machine tools issues promissory notesto the seller, with deferred payment of up to five years. The seller thendiscounts the notes payable at a MLT. The MLT decides whether to make applicationto MC for Sabatini Law benefits for the financing. If it applies, and ifMC approves, the interest contribution is paid in one lump sum by MC eitherto the MLT, or to the seller, which in turn passes the contribution onto the buyer. The buyer then pays the MLT on the notes according to schedule,including all the charges and fees required by the institution.The contribution is calculated as the present value of the difference betweenthe stream of payments, over the term of all notes, using a market discountrate (the ``reference rate'') and the stream of payments using a beneficialdiscount rate (calculated as a certain percentage of the reference rate).The benefit associated with the lower discount rate is passed on to thebuyer as a lump sum interest contribution for its obligations on the promissorynotes. The discount transaction between the seller and the MLT for thenotes remains a commercial operation, because the actual discount rateis a market rate.Benefits under the Sabatini Law are available to companies throughout Italyat varying levels depending upon company location. The benefit is calculatedusing a discount rate equal to 35 percent of the reference rate for purchasesof machines to be used in production units in southern Italy and a discountrate of 45 percent of the reference rate for purchases of machines to beused in production units in the remaining areas of Italy. The MC contributionaccounts for the balance of the reference rate. During verification wefound that the respondent companies received Sabatini Law contributionsequal to the minimum level of benefit (<T3>i.e.,</T3> a discount rate of 45 percent of the reference rate).The text of the Sabatini Law specifies no limitation regarding beneficiaries;all companies are eligible. Article One establishes a minimum machinerycost that now stands at L. 1,000,000. The text of the Sabatini Law doesnot limit eligibility based on regional location.During verification, we reviewed documentation relating to the availabilityand use of Sabatini benefits throughout Italy. We verified that between14 and 16 industrial groups covering all spheres of manufacturing receivedSabatini Law benefits in each of the years from 1982 through 1986. Theseindustrial groupings were as follows: Mining; food; textiles and clothing;skins, leather and shoes; wood and furniture; metallurgy; mechanics; non-metallicminerals; chemicals and artificial fibers; paper and cardboard; other manufacturing;agriculture and livestock; building construction and plant installation;trade; transportation and communication; and other services. We also verifiedthat non-metallic mineral processing, the industrial group in which graniteproduction falls, received neither a dominant nor a disproportionate shareof the Sabatini Law benefits in any of these years.Because the manufacturers, producers and exporters in Italy of certaingranite products received only the minimum benefit under the Sabatini Law,and because we verified that Sabatini Law benefits are not limited to aspecific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,we determine that the minimum level benefits received by the respondentcompanies under the Sabatini Law are not counteravailable.E. IVA DeductionsThis program was not alleged by petitioner but was discovered in reviewingthe financial statements of the respondent companies. Under Article 15of Law 130, companies operating in Italy were granted a six percent crediton the balance of their value-added tax, the ``imposta sul valore aggiunto''(IVA), for purchases of depreciable assets ordered between April 26 andDecember 31, 1983, and delivered before December 31, 1984. For purchasesordered or delivered after these dates, credits in the same amount wereallowed only for purchases approved under Law 696 (<T3>see </T3>section II.B. of this notice). The last application date forcredits under Article 15 of Law 130 was the year-end IVA return for 1984,due on March 5, 1985, while the last application date for credits underLaw 696 was the year-end IVA return for 1986, due on March 5, 1987. Weverified that, since the termination of these laws, there has been no renewalof the six percent credit. However, because credits could be carried forwardor received as future cash payments a year or more after filing the return,we were unable to verify that qualifying companies would no longer receivelagged benefits.Article 15 states that qualifying companies must operate in an industrialcategory listed under Groups IV through XIV of a ministerial decree ofOctober 29, 1974. Groups IV through XIV include the following manufacturingand artisan activities: extraction of metallic and non-metallic minerals;food processing; wood processing; mechanical and metallurgical manufacturing;non-metallic mineral processing, which includes granite processing; chemicalmanufacturing; pulp and paper manufacturing; skins and leather processing;textiles and garment manufacturing; and rubber, resins and plastics manufacturing.If a company's activities fell under one of these categories and it purchaseddepreciable assets, other than real estate, it could claim the deductionautomatically in its IVA returns.We verified that the credit is applied for simply by entering the properamount in a year-end IVA return. There is no formal approval process. Rejectionsoccur only if a tax audit reveals that a firm's activities fall outsideGroups IV through XIV.Because a six percent credit under Article 15 of Law 130 and under Law696 was available to virtually all Italian manufacturing firms for depreciableassets related to manufacturing, and because we have no evidence that theGOI exercises discretion through an application and approval process inadministering this program, we determine that this program is not limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,within the meaning of the Act and, therefore, is not counteravailable.F. Income Tax ProgramsThe following programs were not alleged by petitioner but were discoveredin reviewing the financial statements submitted by the respondent companies.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Reinvestment Fund Under Article 54 of DPR 597/73</ITAG>Italian firms are permitted to claim a tax exemption for any capital gainsearned on the sale of fixed assets, provided that the gains are reinvestedin capital assets. Article 54 of Presidential Decree (DPR) 597/73 statesthat firms must establish a special liability fund for capital gains, andreinvest these tax-exempt gains in depreciable assets in the second fiscalyear following the one in which the gains were realized.We verified that this provision of Italian tax law is available to allentities in Italy, regardless of geographic location or type of industry.Receipt of this exemption is only contingent upon a company's subsequentuse of the gains for reinvestment in capital assets. Because benefits underArticle 54 of (DPR) 597/73 are available to all Italian firms and becausewe have no evidence that the GOI exercises discretion through an applicationand approval process in administering this program, we determine that thisprovision is not limited to a specific enterprise or industry, or groupof enterprises or industries, within the meaning of the Act and, therefore,is not countervailable.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Accelerated Depreciation</ITAG>Article 68 of DPR 597/73 sets forth rules governing the depreciation ofassets under Italian tax law. The normal deductible depreciation of a company'sassets is dependent upon the asset's classification in the Italian government'sdepreciation schedule. In addition, accelerated depreciation of an extra15 percent above the normal rate can be claimed for the first three yearsafter the asset is acquired.We verified that normal rates of depreciation under Article 68 of DPR 597/73are based on the useful lives of assets in individual industries and thatthe accelerated rate is available to all Italian firms regardless of geographiclocation or type of industry. On this basis, and because we have no evidencethat the GOI exercises discretion through an application and approval processin administering this program, we determine that this program is not limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,with the meaning of the Act and, therefore, is not countervailable.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Revaluation of Assets under Law 72 of 1983 and Law 576 of 1975</ITAG>The Italian government allowed all companies to revalue assets in 1975and again in 1983 to reflect market value rather than book value. The revaluationswere necessary to account for periods of high inflation which precededthese years. Because we verified that all Italian firms, regardless ofgeographic location or type of industry, were permitted to revalue assets,and because we have no evidence that the GOI exercises discretion throughan application and approval process in administering this program, we determinethat these revaluations were not limited to a specific enterprise or industry,or group of enterprises or industries, within the meaning of the Act and,therefore, are not countervailable.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Contributions Under Article 55 of DPR 597/73</ITAG>Article 55 of DPR 597/73, relating to ``contingent assets,'' authorizesItalian companies to establish a reserve fund which postpones the paymentof taxes on certain monies received by a company until such funds are distributedas profits to that company's shareholders. Funds received from the governmentin the form of a reimbursement, for example, would be included on the assetside of a company's balance sheet. Article 55 permits the company to shieldtemporarily such revenues from taxation by establishing an offsetting reservefund on the debit side of its balance sheet, such that the money held onreserve becomes taxable only when distributed as profits.Because we verified that Article 55 applies to all taxpayers regardlessof geographic location or type of industry and because we have no evidencethat the GOI exercises discretion through an application and approval processin administering the program, we determine that this program is not limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries,within the meaning of the Act and, therefore, is not countervailable.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Programs Determined Not To Be Used</ITAG>We determine, based on verified information, that manufacturers, producersor exporters in Italy of certain granite products did not apply for, claim,or receive benefits during the review period for exports of certain graniteproducts to the United States under the following programs:<T3>A. Rebates of Indirect Taxes Under Law 639</T3>Italian Law 639 authorizes the rebate of customs duties and certain indirecttaxes upon the export of products containing certain raw materials. Weverified that the respondent companies were not eligible for and did notreceive benefits under this program because it is available only to mechanicalindustries.B. Export Credit FinancingUnder Italian Law 227, a medium-term export credit line is available toforeign purchasers that import Italian goods and services. Administeredby Mediocredito Centrale, this program applies only to export credits ofgreater than 18 months. We verified that none of the respondent companies,nor their U.S. importers, had outstanding credit lines under this programduring the review period.C. Mezzogiorno Regional Assistance ProgramsAccordingly to the responses, companies with facilities located in themezzogiorno region of Italy are eligible for certain government programsaimed at the economic development of this region. The programs allegedby the petitioner under this regional development plan are: (1) Nationalcorporate tax exemptions; (2) local corporate tax exemptions; (3) capitalgrants; (4) interest rate reductions; and (5) reductions in social securitypayments. We verified that the first four programs were not used by therespondent companies during the review period. The last program, reductionsin social security payments, is described in section I.C. of this notice.D. European Investment Bank (EIB) LendingThe EIB is a European Community (EC) financial institution which offersloans to designated depressed areas of EC member states. EIB loans werefound to be countervailable in our 1982 steel cases after specific allegationsfrom the petitioners involved and a full-length investigation of theircountervailability. <T3>See Carbon Steel Products from Belgium, </T3>47 FR 39304, 39929 (September7, 1982).In the present investigation, the petitioner did not allege any EC programsin its petition. We first found references to loans denominated in ECUs,some involving the ``BEI,'' in company financial statements submitted aspart of the responses to our initial questionnaire. We requested informationon these loans in a supplemental questionnaire; however, the respondentcompanies stated that these loans were not from any EC-related entity,nor were they provided or mandated by any government program. As we normallydo for purposes of preliminary determinations, we took these statementsat face value. At no time did petitioner come in with a formal allegationagainst EC programs.During our verification of company responses in late April, we examinedall loan contracts entered into by these companies and discovered thatseveral loans, although disbursed through Italian MLTs, were funded bythe EIB. Immediately following verification, we reviewed prior countervailingduty determinations involving EC programs, and noted that EIB loans hadbeen determined to be countervailable in the 1982 steel cases. On May 25,1988, we requested comments on these loans from all interested partiesincluding, for the first time, the Delegation of the Commission of theEC. In a May 27, 1988, letter, the EC Commission pledged its full cooperationin our investigation. We detemined that it was appropriate to investigatethese loans and, therefore, on June 1, 1988, we forwarded a questionnaireto the EC Commission, the respondent companies and the GOI. We receivedresponses on June 14 and 15. Verification was conducted between June 29and July 1, and included the EIB and the ECSC (discussed in Section I.B.).We received initial briefs on the EC verification on July 7 and rebuttalbriefs on July 8.By necessity, our investigation of EIB financing has been limited to abbreviatedquestionnaire and response, verification and briefing periods, coveringa total of only five weeks. Due to time constraints, we were unable totake full advantage of our standard investigative procedures, which normallyallow ample time for supplemental questionnaires, the thorough analysisof responses and comprehensive, in-depth verifications. In contrast, wewere fully able to follow such procedures in our investigation of the programadministered by the GOI. For example, we sent an initial questionnaireand four supplemental questionnaires to the GOI and respondent companiesbetween August 1987 and March 1988. We spent weeks analyzing each responsebefore seeking additional information or clarifications. We also spentmore than four weeks verifying the GOI and company responses.Despite the restrictions described above, based on the questionnaire responsesubmitted by the EC and the subsequent verification conducted at the EIB'soffices in Luxembourg, we have been able to determine the countervailabilityof the ECSC interest rebates received by one respondent company (<T3>see </T3>section I.B., above) and to establish that none of the respondentcompanies received EIB-sourced loans for firms located in depressed areasof the EC. The loans actually disbursed to the respondent companies throughthe EIB are funded by resources under the New Community Instrument (NCI)and not by EIB's own resources. The NCI is a pool of funds that is financeddirectly by the EC Commission.This is the first countervailing duty investigation in which we have examinedNCI loans and, for the reason described above, this initial investigationhas been an unusually short one.The EC Commission has cooperated fully in this investigation, yet had onlya fraction of the time available to the other parties to participate inthis investigation. Because of the limited time which was available tous, we find that difficult questions remain concerning both the linkagebetween NCI loans and the EIB's regular lending and the EIB decision-makingprocess in granting global loans to intermediary banking institutions inmember states. Without the benefit of having more information on the record,particularly with respect to a program that we are examining for the firsttime, the only way we are examining for the first time, the only way wecould make a determination as to the countervailability of this programwould be by resorting to the best information available. We have calculated benefits under the NCI program and found that the benefitsreceived by the respondent companies are <T3>de minimis. </T3>Furthermore, no company's subsidy rate would riseabove <T3>de minimis </T3>were we to find this program countervailable and add<T3>ad valorem </T3>rates for this program to rates for the other programs.Therefore, due to the unique circumstances surrounding our investigationof the NCI program, we have decided to reserve judgment on the countervailabilityof this program until some future investigation allows us sufficient timeand opportunity to examine the program in greater depth. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Program Determined Not to Exist</ITAG>We determine, based on verified information, that the following programdoes not exist. This program was described in <T3>Certain Granite: </T3>Loans Under Law 908During verification we found no evidence of the existence of Law 908 whichwas alleged to have provided subsidized loans at below market rates forcertain industrial projects in northern and central Italy. <ITAG tagnum="84">Interested Party Comment </ITAG><T3>Comment 1: </T3>Petitioner supports our preliminary determination thatDecree 902 benefits are countervailable, based upon regional differencesin interest rate, loan amount, repayment terms, and type of project eligible.Petitioner argues that there is no minimum benefit available to all companiesin Italy under Decree 902, because a company in the Mezzogiorno is noteligible for the minimum Decree 902 benefit provided to companies in northernand central Italy. Petitioner contends that, where benefits vary from regionto region, such benefits constitute regional subsidies, quoting <T3>Groundfish from Canada</T3> at 10045, ``[d]espite the fact that thecriteria for assignment to a tier [of benefits] may be neutral, the programnevertheless authorizes benefits to vary from tier to tier, and thus, fromregion to region.'' Petitoner further contends that it is immaterial thatDecree 902 funds were provided to a wide range of industries, given theregional nature of the program. Respondent companies and the GOI argue that the minimum Decree 902 benefitis available to all small- and medium-sized businesses in Italy and, therefore,does not constitute a countervailable regional subsidy. Respondents furtherargue that limitation to small-and medium-sized businesses does not renderDecree 902 benefits countervailable. They cite the Department's <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: Forged UndercarriageComponents from Italy </T3>(48 FR 52111, 52116, November 16, 1983) (<T3>Forged Undercarriage Components), </T3>where the Department determinedthat a benefit that was generally available to small-and medium-sized Companiesin Italy pursuant to a program similar to Decree 902 was not countervailable.Respondents argue that the Department distinguishes between special benefitsprovided to particular regions and any minimum benefit available to allcompanies in determining whether a program confers a preferential regionalbenefit, quantifying the amount of the preference by comparing the specialbenefits to the minimum benefit. Respondents contend that the benefit iscountervailable only if the company's benefit exceeds the benchmark (<T3>i.e., </T3>the minimum benefit), citing the Deprtment's final determinationin <T3>Groundfish from Canada, supra, </T3>at 10045.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>A program is determined to be regional and, therefore,limited only when its funding is authorized by the central government tobenefit only certain regions within its jurisdiction. In this investigation,we verified that Decree 902 provides varying levels of benefits, dependingupon regional location, but that any small-and medium-sized business inItaly can receive at least the minimum Decree 902 benefit, regardless oflocation. We also verified that the respondent companies which receivedbenefits under Decree 902 received only the minimum benefit. Both petitioner and respondents cite <T3>Groundfish from Canada, </T3>in support of opposing arguments on thisissue. In <T3>Groundfish from Canada, </T3>we found countervailable the IRDP program,which provided varying levels, or ``tiers,'' of benefits to companies dependingupon regional location. We determined the benefit under the IRDP programby taking the difference between the level of assistance actually providedto the companies under investigation and the level of assistance providedto companies located in areas eligible only for the minimum, or Tier I,benefit. We found countervailable only that portion of a company's benefitwhich exceeded the minimum-level benefit. Applying the <T3>Groundfish from Canada, </T3>analysis to this case, the ``benchmark''for determining whether the respondent companies received a countervailablesubsidy would be the minimum benefit available under Decree 902. Becausethe respondent companies in question received only the minimum, or benchmark,Decree 902 benefit, there is no countervailable subsidy provided underthis program to the producers of certain granite products from Italy.<T3>Comment 2: </T3>Respondent companies argue that Zilio Graniti S.p.A.,a company related to Savema S.p.A. (Savema), has never received any benefitsunder Decree 902. Respondents contend that the ``Zilio Graniti'' identifiedby the Department during verification as having received a loan under Decree902 is not the Savema-related Zilio Graniti S.p.A., but rather is an unrelatedcompany, Remo Zilio Graniti andamp; Marmi S.r.l. Respondent companies also argue that the purchase of Furrer stock by Henrauxin 1986 eliminated any possible benefit from the Decree 902 loan grantedto Furrer. Any countervailable subsidy conferred by the loan ``flowed through''to Furrer shareholders at the time of the purchase and, therefore, wouldno longer benefit Furrer.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We have found the minimum level of benefits underthe Decree 902 program to be not countervailable and that the respondentcompanies received the minimum level. Therefore, the issue of an individualcompany's receipt of benefits under Decree 902 is moot.<T3>Comment 3: </T3>Petitioner contends that, due to the direct financialinvolvement and control by the GOI in Mediocredito Centrale, IMI and regionalcredit institutions, all medium- and long-term loans granted by such creditinstitutions to respondent companies should be considered to confer countervailablesubsidies where the terms and conditions are inconsistent with commercialconsiderations. Petitioner further contends that granite producers whichwere not reasonable commercial credit risks have been able to borrow fromthese insititutions and that such borrowings amount to direct subsidizationby the Italian government.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We disagree. Government ownership or control ofa credit institution does not necessarily lead to the conclusion that thecredit institution is operating in other than a commercial fashion, nordoes it mean that the funds provided are part of a cuntervailable program.The fact that a credit institution is government-owned does not automaticallymake its loans preferential and countervailable. During verification, wereviewed all loan contracts for each company and identified the loan transactionswhich are given under government-mandated (GOI or EC) programs. We foundno evidence that those that did not specify a government program were disbursedon a non-commercial basis.<T3>Comment 4: </T3>Petitioner argues that the Italian respondent companiesare uncreditworthy and, as such, any countervailable loans should be analyzedin accordance with the methodology for uncreditworthy companies set forthin the ``Subsidies Appendix'' attached to the notice of <T3>Cold-Rolled Carbon Steel Flat-Rolled Products from Argentina: FinalAffirmative Countervailing Duty Determination and Countervailing Duty Order</T3>(49 FR 18006, April 26, 1984).Respondent companies assert that they are not uncreditworthy. Respondentsargue that petitioner's uncreditworthiness allegation, filed immediatelyprior to verification and just two months before the final determinationwas both untimely and inadequate. In support of this argument, respondentscite previous determinations in which the Department dismissed such allegationson the basis of their untimeliness: <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: Certain StainlessSteel Hollow Products from Sweden</T3> (52 FR 5794, 5800, February 26,1987) and <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination and CountervailingDuty Order: Lime from Mexico </T3>(49 FR 35672, 35677, September 11, 1984).<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We agree that the petitioner's uncreditworthinessallegation was untimely and, therefore, we did not consider this allegationin this investigation. A creditworthiness determination requires a complexanalysis of a company's present and past financial health, as reflectedin its financial statements and accounts, its ability to meet obligationswith its cash flow, and projections of future profitability based on marketstudies, country and industry economic forecasts, and project and loanappraisals. Not only the verification, but the entire investigation mustbe structured to accommodate this analysis. Petitioner had access to respondents'financial statements as of October 1987. Using those financial statementsas a basis, they alleged uncreditworthiness on April 1, 1988, two daysbefore our departure for verification, and approximately two months beforeour scheduled final determination.<T3>Comment 5: </T3>Petitioner contends that the average long-term interestrates provided by the GOI should not be used as benchmarks in any long-termloan calculation because the rates include other than commercial long-termlending rates. Petitioner adds that short-term benchmark information providedby the GOI is also insufficiently supported, and that both the long- andshort-term interest rates wrongly include rates on public sector financing.Respondent companies argue that we should not exclude public sector financingin calculating a benchmark interest rate for short-term loans, becausegovernment ownership of a company does not mean that the company is subsidized.Therefore, they argue that such financing should be included in our benchmark,absent verified information that it is not given on commercial terms.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>Since no respondent company received a countervailableshort-term loan, this issue is moot with regard to a short-term banchmark.Since the long-term interest rates provided by the GOI for the stone-processingindustries included short-term rates and the GOI could not separate outpurely long-term rates, we examined long-term commercial interest ratesin Italy published by Morgan Guaranty (World Financial Markets), by theInternational Monetary Fund, and by the Organization for Economic Cooperationand Development. In each case, the long-term interest rates reported bythese organizations were lower than those reported by the GOI. Therefore,we used the rates provided by the GOI in lieu of appropriate company-specificlong-term benchmarks for the respondent companies for which we calculatedbenefits (for sub-loans under the EC's NCI; <T3>see </T3>Section III.D.).<T3>Comment 6: </T3>Petitioner supports the Department's preliminary determinationon the countervailability of the program allowing for reductions in socialsecurity payments for companies located in the Mezzogiorno.Respondent companies argue that benefits received by Henraux under thisprogram for employees at storage yards in the Mezzogiorno are not countervailable,because they do not benefit the production or exportation of the subjectmerchandise to the United States. Respondent companies contend that theDepartment confirmed during verification that all granite sold throughHenraux's storage yards in the Mezzorgiorno is sold to Italian customers,citing the Henraux verification report at pages two and nine. As furthersupport for this argument, respondents cite the Department's <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: Porcelain-On-SteelCooking Ware from Mexico </T3>(51 FR 36447, October 10, 1986) (<T3>Mexican Cooking Ware</T3>), in which the Department concluded thatlow-interest loans to finance consumer goods manufactured in Mexico didnot provide countervailable subsidies because they did not benefit theproduction or exportation of the subject merchandise to the United States.They also cite <T3>Industrial Nitrocellulose from France: Final Results of CountervailingDuty Administrative Review </T3>(52 FR 833, 836, January 9, 1987) whichstates that ``benefits tied solely to the domestic sales of a product arenot countervailable.''The GOI contends that, in accordance with the Department's policy and practice,reductions in social security payments for firms located in the Mezzogiornois not a regional subsidy. As in the Department's determination concerninga labor assistance program in its <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: Certain SteelProducts from the Federal Republic of Germany </T3>(47 FR 39345, September7, 1982) (German Steel), the Mezzorgiorno programs are structured to increaseoverall employment in this historically underdeveloped area_not to targeta specific region or industry. Further, the GOI argures that the Departmentmistakenly has defined the Mezzogiorno as a ``region.'' The Mezzogiornois not a region, they argue, because it includes more than the geographicsouth.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We disagree with respondents' assertion that socialsecurity payment reductions benefit only domestic sales. In <T3>Mexican Cooking War, </T3>we investigated the Fomex frontier program,which finances the production, inventory, purchase and sale of consumergoods manufactured in border zones, as well as consumer products producedelsewhere and sold in border zones. ``Border zones'' are regions 20 kilometerswide, parallel to the U.S.-Mexican borderline, and certain other ``freezones'' within Mexico. We verified that the loans under this program weretied by law to sales of products within Mexico.In the current investigation, social security reductions for companieslocated in the Mezzorgiorno are not tied by law to domestic sales. Thereis no requirement in the program that benefits go to facilities which carryout domestic sales exclusively. Absent such an absolute link between benefitsprovided and domestic sales carried out, we cannot determine that no benefitsare conferred on the production or export of granite destined for the UnitedStates. All sales may benefit equally from the social security reductions.Nothing prohibits a company from exporting granite from its facilitiesin the Mezzogiorno for which the social security reductions have been provided.A program is determined to be regional and, therefore, limited when itsfunding is authorized by the central government to benefit only certainregions within its jurisdiction. In <T3>German Steel, </T3>we found that certain labor assistance programswere part of a national policy to relieve unemployment and were not limitedto specific regions. Although the Mezzogiorno may include more than thegeographic south, as the GOI argues, it is still a ``region'' for our purposes.It is a legally recognized area within Italy, which has been designatedto receive certain special benefits not available elsewhere. Thus, we havedetermined the program providing social security payment reductions forcompanies located in the Mezzogiorno to be countervailable.<T3>Comment 7:</T3> Respondent companies and the GOI contend that the Departmentshould not have broadened its investigation from seven to seventeen companiesmerely because the original seven companies and their related companieseach requested exclusion from any countervailing duty order that mightbe issued. Respondent companies argue that by requesting exclusion, theoriginal seven did not ``set themselves on a separate investigative track.''Therefore, they contend that the Department should terminate its investigationwith respect to the ten additional companies.Respondents further argue that nothing in the Department's regulationsor in the countervailing duty law suggests that a distinction should bemade between companies requesting exclusion and other companies. They arguethat section 355.38 of the regulations provides only for exclusion froma countervailing duty <T3>order</T3>, not from an <T3>investigation. </T3>Therefore, respondents contend that, until an orderis issued (if ever), the Department should conduct the investigation inthe same manner as it would if no exclusions had been requested.Furthermore, respondent companies and the GOI contend that the Departmenthad presumably deemed the original seven companies as representative, inthat the Department only issued its initial questionnaire to those sevencompanies. They assert that the representativeness of the original sevencompanies, based on 1986 export statistics, is an objective characteristicwhich cannot be changed by the legal actions taken by the companies afterthe commencement of the investigation. As support for these assertions,respondents cite <T3>Fabricas el Carmen, S.A. v. United States,</T3> 672 F. Supp. 1465,1479 (Ct. Int'l Trade 1987), remand order vacated as moot, 680 F. Supp.1577 (1988) (<T3>Fabricas</T3>), for the proposition that Commerce erred in excludingthose companies that had filed timely exclusion requests from its ``representative''sample of the investigated industry used to calculate the country-widecountervailing duty rate.Petitioner asserts that the Department's regulations permit an investigationof all producers of the subject merchandise, without limitation, that theDepartment has discretion to decide how many companies to investigate,and that the Department's regulations make no provision for terminatingthe investigation of companies after they have been included in the investigation.<T3>DOC Position:</T3> Petitioner correctly states that the Department'sregulations permit an investigation of all producers of the subject merchandise,without limitation, and that the Department has discretion to decide howmany companies to investigate. While our preference is to examine all manufacturers,producers and exporters of the subject merchandise in each investigation,this may not be administratively feasible when there are numerous potentialrespondents. In such circumstances, we collect either aggregate data onthe industry as a whole, if this is feasible and verifiable, or we selecta representative group upon which to base our determinations.We initially requested the GOI to identify the largest manufacturers andexporters accounting for 60 percent of exports of the subject merchandiseto the United States and to forward copies of the questionnaire to them.Once identified, these companies requested exclusion. As discussed in ourpreliminary determination, it is our policy to select additional companieswhen companies in our original group request exclusion. The court in <T3>Fabricas</T3> addressed the issue of how we calculate country-widerates; it did not suggest how we should structure our investigation tocover as large a group of producers as we find appropriate and administrativelyfeasible to investigate. In this investigation, we determined it was necessaryto examine a broader representation of companies which petitioner allegedreceived countervailable benefits.<T3>Comment 8:</T3> Petitioner argues that only companies which both produce<T3>and</T3> export granite should be excluded from any countervailingduty order that may be issued. Because exporters can easily ship graniteproducts produced by another, subsidized firm, the inclusion of exporterswhich do not produce granite is the only way to ensure that countervailingduties are levied on all subsidized granite imports.Respondents argue that the Department should exclude from any countervailingduty order all companies that have filed timely requests for exclusionthat are either producers <T3>or</T3> exporters of the subject merchandise. Respondents cite theDepartment's regulations, section 355.38: ``[<T3>a</T3>]<T3>ny firm</T3> which does not benefit from a subsidy alleged or foundto have been granted to <T3>other firms</T3> producing <T3>or</T3> exporting the merchandise subject to the investigation shall,on timely application therefor, be duly excluded from a CountervailingDuty Order'', 19 CFR 355.38 (1987) (emphasis added).<T3>DOC Position:</T3> Because our final determination is negative, thisissue is moot.<T3>Comment 9:</T3> Petitioner argues that depreciation under Article 68of DPR 597/73 provides benefits (<T3>i.e.</T3>, higher depreciation rates) for specific industries and,therefore, is countervailable. Because Italy's depreciation schedule classificationsare industry specific rather than asset specific, and because rates varyacross industries, petitioner argues that this tax provision should bedetermined to be countervailable. Petitioner further argues that the Departmentwas unable to verify that a wide variety of industries used all of thetax programs.Respondent companies and the GOI argue that Italian tax law provisionsconcerning accelerated depreciation, revaluation of fixed assets, and capitalgains reinvestment provide no countervailable benefit because they applygenerally to all enterprises in Italy. In support of this contention, respondentscite <T3>Bethlehem Steel Corp.</T3> v. <T3>United States</T3>, 7 CIT 339, 590 F. Supp. 1237, 1245 (Ct. Int'l Trade1984) (``laws of taxation are not subsidies to the taxpayer * * * whenthey present equal opportunities to reduce the exaction''); and <T3>Carlisle Tire andamp; Rubber Co.</T3> v. <T3>United States</T3>, 5 CIT 229, 564 F. Supp. 834, 839 (Ct. Int'l Trade1983) (<T3>Carlisle</T3>) (accelerated depreciation programs that were generallyavailable to entire business community in investigated country were notcountervailable benefits).<T3>DOC Position:</T3> We verified that all the income tax programs underinvestigation are available to all Italian firms and that IVA deductionsare available to Italian firms in virtually all industries. Furthermore,we established at verification that these provisions are widely used and,therefore, have found them to be not countervailable, including accelerateddepreciation under Article 68 of DPR 597/73. By their nature, depreciationrates vary by both industry and by asset because the useful lives of assetsdiffer among industries and among types of assets. <T3>See</T3>, for example, the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System(Rev. Proc. 77-10, 1977-1 C.B. 548 (RR-38)). We found nothing unusual inthe Italian depreciation schedules to suggest that they benefit a specificenterprise or industry or group of enterprises or industries.<T3>Comment 10:</T3> Petitioner argues that financing under the SabatiniLaw is countervailable given that different interest rates are availableto different regions in Italy. Furthermore, petitioner argues that a specificgroup of industries receives these benefits, <T3>i.e.</T3>, companies which use machine tools and production machineryvalued at over L. 1,000,000. They contend that the evidence of industryuse on the record is insufficient to determine that Sabatini Law financingis not limited. Petitioner contends that we should consider verificationof the Sabatini program to be inadequate because the GOI refused to allowthe verification team to review documents on the approval process for thisprogram. In addition, petitioner believes that an extra benefit is conferredon Sabatini Law recipients through the stamp and registration tax exemption.Respondent companies and the GOI argue that verified evidence on the recorddemonstrates that benefits under the Sabatini Law are available to allItalian enterprises and that they do not benefit an individual industryor group of industries or a particular geographic region of Italy. Respondentsargue that benefits under a program are not countervailable simply becauseminimum eligibility criteria exist, such as the Sabatini Law requirementthat equipment purchases be valued in excess of L. 1,000,000. In supportof this argument they cite <T3>PPG Industries, Inc.</T3> v. <T3>United States</T3>, 662 F. Supp. 258, 266 (CIT 1987) (``the mere factthat a program contains certain eligibility requirements for participationdoes not transform the program into one which has provided a countervailablebenefit'') and <T3>Carlisle, supra,</T3> at 836 note 3 (certain tax benefits are not countervailablesimply because not every company could meet the specified eligibility criteria).<T3>DOC Position: </T3>During this investigation, we reviewed both thelaws and regulations governing various Italian programs as well as theactual availability and receipt of benefits under such programs. In eachinstance, we made a factual determination as to whether benefits were conferredin such a manner as to be properly considered limited to a specific industryor group of industries.We verified that companies throughout Italy are eligible for Sabatini benefits,although at varying levels. We also verified that the respondent companieswhich received Sabatini benefits received the minimum benefit. <T3>See</T3> section II.D. and DOC Position on Comment 1. Eligiblity forSabatini benefits is based on objective and precise criteria specifiedin the law and amending decrees, and we verified that each company whichused this program qualified and was approved for Sabatini Benefits basedon these criteria. We saw no evidence that the GOI exercises discretionor deviates from these criteria in granting Sabatini benefits. Furthermore,we verified that thousands of companies in virtually every sector havereceived Sabatini benefits.The stamp and registration tax exemption applies to all companies thatqualify under the Sabatini Law. We have determined that the minimum Sabatinibenefit is not countervailable because it is not limited to a specificenterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries. The sameholds true for the stamp and registration tax exemptions provided for underthe Sabatini Law.<T3>Comment 11:</T3> Petitioner argues that contributions for the purchaseof electronic equipment granted under Law 696 are countervailable due tothe Department's findings at verification that this program targeted manufacturingand mining. Petitioner asserts that, while it appears that a large numberof industrial groups have benefitted from Law 696, there likely were manymore companies deemed ineligible to receive benefits. Finally, petitionerargues that the Department should find the program countervailable becausewe received information during verification that Law 696 was terminateddue to EC objections that Italy was ``engaged in subsidization.''Respondent companies and the GOI argue that verified evidence on the recorddemonstrates that benefits under Law 696 are available to all Italian enterprisesand that such benefits do not benefit an individual industry or group ofindustries or a particular geographic region of Italy. Furthermore, respondentsargue that the fact that Law 696 benefits are limited to certain small-and medium-sized companies does not make the benefit countervailable, citing<T3>Forged Undercarriage Components, supra.</T3><T3>DOC Position:</T3> At verification, we confirmed that benefits underLaw 696 are available to all small-and medium-sized companies in Italythat purchased qualifying electronic equipment. We also examined the applicationand review process carried out by the Ministry of Industry and Commerceand observed that the approval and rejection of applications was basedsolely upon criteria set forth in the law (<T3>i.e.</T3>, that the company must be a small- or medium-sized enterpriseand that it must actually purchase a piece of electronic equipment). Therefore,we found no governmental discretion outside the law in the administrationof the Law 696 program. Finally, a determination by the EC that a programof an EC member state is (or is not) a subsidy is not pertinent to theDepartment's independent determination as to whether the same program constitutesa countervailable benefit within the meaning of the Act.<T3>Comment 12:</T3> Respondents argue that if benefits under the SabatiniLaw, Law 696, and Law 130 are found to be countervailable, such benefitsshould be allocated according to the Department's grant methodology, becausethey are all provided in the form of lump sum payments. According to respondents,such benefits should be allocated over the average useful life of the assetsused to produce the subject merchandise, as set forth in the U.S. InternalRevenue Service 1977 Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System (Rev. 77-10,1977-1 C.B. 548), or over ten years for assets used in the production ofgranite.Respondent companies argue that to the extent the Department finds countervailablethe benefits provided under Law 696, Law 130, Law 614, or Decree 902 (withrespect to northern and central Italy), the contervailing duty rate setin the final determination must take into account the fact that benefitsunder these programs have been discontinued. Respondents cite <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination and CountervailingDuty Order: Carbon Steel Wire Rod from Malaysia </T3>(53 FR 13303, 13307,April 22, 1988), <T3>Certain Textile Mill Products from Mexico: Final Results of CountervailingDuty Administrative Review </T3>(52 FR 45010, 45012, November 25, 1987),And <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: AcetylsalicylicAcid (Aspirin) from Turkey </T3>(52 FR 24494, 24498, July 1, 1987), insupport of this argument. <T3>DOC Position:</T3> We have determined that the minimum level of benefitsreceived by the producers of certain granite products under Law 902, SabatiniLaw, Law 696 and Law 130 are not countervailable. Therefore, these issuesare moot. Since the benefit under Law 614 is <T3>de minimis,</T3> the question of issuing a separate duty deposit rateis also moot.Comment 13: Petitioner contends that the provision of preferential transportationrates under Law 887 is countervailable because it provides a preferentialbenefit to a specific group of enterprises or industires. Petitioner basesthis contention on the following conclusions: (1) The preferential transprotationrates constitute a regional program applicable only to shipments from theItalian islands to the Italian mainland, and (2) the program is also industry-specific,providing lower rates only for shipments of raw mineral substances.Respondent companies and the GOI argue that, because the reduced rail ratesprovided by the Italian State Railway are available to any consumer ofminerals transported by rail from the Italian islands to the Italian mainland,these rates do not constitute countervailable benefits. They further assertthat the industries which consume the minerals that benefit from reducedrail rates are numerous and diverse. In addition to the Italian stone industry,they cite industries that consume Sardinian coal (<T3>i.e.</T3>, steel, glass, textile, chemical, and electrical utilities)as examples of eligible beneficiaries of reduced rates. Respondent citethe <T3>Final Negative Countervailing Duty Determination: Certain SoftwoodProducts from Canada</T3> (48 FR 24159, 24167 (May 31, 1983) as supportfor this argument, based on the ``legal principle'' articulated in thatcase that a benefit is not countervailable if it is available to numerousand diverse industries. Respondent companies also argue that the reduced rail rates do not confera countervailable regional subsidy. They state that the only regional elementto the reduced rail rates involves the raw mineral producers and not theconsumers. Therefore, they argue that any regional benefit that may beprovided goes only to the mineral producers (granite quarriers) and notto granite producers subject to this investigation. Respondents further point out that reduced rail rates are paid or bestowedon granite blocks. They argue that, at most, granite producers may receivean upstream subsidy from this benefit on granite blocks, which are inputsused in the manufacture or production of the subject merchandise. Theyassert that any benefit related to these blocks would have to be analyzedunder the upstream subsidy provision of the contervailing duty law, whichrequires an allegation of upstream subsidization by the petitioner. <T3>DOC Position: </T3>Information submitted to us by the GOI prior toand during verification gave no indication that any respondent companyactually received rail transportation benefits under Law 887 during thereview period. Consequently, we did not press the GOI for extensive dataregarding actual use of this program by Italian industrial groups. At verification,GOI representatives specified four raw mineral substances which qualifyfor the 30 percent rail reduction under Law 887: Oil, clay, marble andgranite. The Department received no documented information from the GOIbeyond this list of four substances during the course of this investigation.We therefore determine that reduced rail rates under Law 887 are limitedto a specific enterprise or industry, or group of enterprises or industries.<T3>See </T3>discussion under Section I.A.Furthermore, we disagree with respondents' argument that transportationbenefits for granite blocks must be analyzed in the upstream subsidiescontext. The benefits discovered during company verification clearly werebestowed upon the respondent companies and not upon upstream input suppliers.Through examination of rail invoices, it was apparent that these companiespaid for the transport of the granite blocks and, as such, directly benefittedfrom the reduced rate for rail transportation from the Italian islands.<T3>Comment 14: </T3>Respondent companies argue that if reduced rail ratesconstitute countervailable benefits, the appropriate methodology is tocalculate a benefit based on the difference between (1) the cost of commerciallyavailable transport alternatives (<T3>e.g., </T3>trucking costs) and (2) the price that respondents actuallypaid as a result of reduced rates. They argue further that the benefitshould be allocated over the combined sales of granite, travertine andmarble sales, because reduced rates are available for shipment of all mineralsfrom the Italian islands to the mainland.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We disagree. The benefit is the difference betweenwhat the company would have paid absent the 30 percent rail rate reductionand what it actually paid given the 30 percent reduction. Furthermore,verified information shows that the respondent companies benefitted fromreduced rail rates for transport of granite blocks only. We therefore allocatedthe benefit solely over the total granite sales of the companies in question.<T3>Comment 15: </T3>Petitioner agrees with the Department's preliminaryfinding that Law 614 local tax concessions are countervailable due to theirregional nature, but disagrees with the calculation methodology. Petitionerargues that the <T3>ad valorem </T3>rate for Law 614 benefits should not take into accountthe effect of the local tax (ILOR) reduction on the national corporate(IRPEG) tax liability. They argue that this approach is akin to the grantingof an offset against the countervailable local tax subsidy by reason ofthe increase in national corporate taxes paid. They contend that such anoffset is not in accordance with section 771(6)(b) of the Act, which placeslimitations on allowable offsets. Instead, petitioner argues that the entireamount of the local tax concession by itself should be measured in theyear received.Petitioner also argues that ``it is the Department's policy to disregardsecondary tax effects on countervailable subsidies,'' citing <T3>Groundfish from Canada, supra, </T3>and argues that the ILOR tax isa national, not a local tax.Respondents state that they are in agreement with the Department's calculationin the preliminary determination of the Law 614 benefit to Granitex, takinginto consideration the net impact of the benefit on the company's totalcorporate income tax liability. They state that the so-called local ILORtax is not comparable to the state income taxes existing in the UnitedStates. They asert that ILOR and IRPEG are merely two elements of a singleunified income tax established by the national Italian government.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>We agree with the assessment of respondents thatthe ILOR tax is a local tax in name only. ILOR is imposed by the nationalgovernment and calculated, as is IRPEG, in the national tax return. Thetax incidence at issue in <T3>Groundfish from Canada </T3>was highly speculative; it involved a futureand uncertain effect that was not simultaneously nor directly calculablefrom the tax benefit in question. In contrast, IRPEG liability bears asimple relationship to ILOR liability and, in fact, cannot be calculateduntil ILOR liability is calculated. Therefore, we have calculated the benefitunder Law 614 based on the company's total corporate income tax liability,including both ILOR and IRPEG. As such, our calculation takes into accountthe primary, and not the secondary, tax effects of the program. The offsetissue is not relevant in this situation.<T3>Comment 16: </T3>Petitioner submits that the export statistics providedby the GOI are unreliable and should not be used as part of the calculationsfor any program found to be countervailable. Because not all exportersof granite to the United States were investigated, petitioner further arguesthat only the sales figures of the companies under investigation may beused in determining the <T3>ad valorem </T3>benefit under specific programs.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>Because no export programs have been found to becountervailable, we have not used export statistics in any of our calculations.In performing our calculations to determine the <T3>ad valorem </T3>benefit under specific domestic programs, we have usedonly the relevant sales values of the companies under investigation.<T3>Comment 17: </T3>Respondents argue that the Department must base calculationsof any countervailing duty rate in this investigation on sales of all respondents,not just on sales of those that did not request exclusion. They contendthat the Department's general policy is to calculate a single, country-widecountervailing duty rate, as provided for under section 706(a)(2) of theAct, which states that a countervailing duty order presumptively appliesto all of the subject merchandise exported from the country under investigation.They contend that neither the statute nor the existing or proposed regulationsrequire that the Department remove from its calculation of a country-widecountervailing duty rate the sates revenues of the companies which requestedexclusion.Respondents also cite <T3>Fabricas, supra, </T3>in support of this assertion. They argue thatthe facts of <T3>Fabricas </T3>are similar to this investigation, with both cases involvinghundreds of companies from which a small representative group was selectedon which to base the investigation. In <T3>Fabricas, </T3>the Court of International Trade (CIT) held that itwas unreasonable for the Department to exclude certain investigated companies,which did not receive greater than <T3>de minimis </T3>benefits, from the sample upon which a representativecountry-wide rate might be based.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>It is our practice to calculate a country-wide ratewhich is a weighted-average rate for all companies whose individual ratesare neither <T3>de minimis</T3> nor significantly different from the rates of othercompanies. In this investigation, no respondent company's individual rateis above <T3>de minimis</T3>. Therefore, we have not calculated country-wide ratesfor those programs determined to be countervailable.<T3>Comment 18:</T3> Respondents state that the only exceptions to thestatutory presumption in favor of calculating a country-wide rate are:(1) If the Department finds that a ``significant differential'' existsbetween the subsidies received by the respondent companies, or (2) if oneor more of the companies is a state-owned enterprise. Respondent assertsthat none of the respondent companies in this investigation is owned bythe state. They argue that any potential countervailable subsidies in thisinvestigation are ``miniscule'' and that, therefore, it is inconceivablethat any significant differential might exist in this investigation. Respondentsfurther argue that, even if the weighted-average subsidy for all respondentsunder investigation were five percent, and the individual company subsidyamounts were to range from zero to ten percent, the Department lacks theauthority to calculate more than one countervailing duty rate that wouldapply to the subject merchandise, as it would be illogical and unfair tocalculate a single, country-wide rate based only on data for the subsidizedcompanies but that would apply to all non-excluded companies, includingunsubsidized companies.<T3>DOC Position: See</T3> DOC Position on Comment 17.<T3>Comment 19:</T3> Petitioner points out a number of problems with, orinaccuracies in, the GOI exclusion certification. Based on these problems,petitioner argues that the Department should not exclude any of the requestingcompanies from any countervailing duty order that may be issued. Petitionerargues that receipt of countervailable benefits by a company requestingexclusion must lead the Department to reject the GOI exclusion certification.Furthermore, petitioner states that all the companies requesting exclusionreceived loans from the EIB or ECSC and, therefore, should not be grantedexclusion.Respondents assert that the vast bulk of the information provided to theDepartment as part of the exclusion certification was confirmed duringverification, with only minor exceptions. Therefore, they argue that theexclusion requests should be granted. Respondents further argue that statutoryand regulatory authority does not require government certification as aprerequisite to granting exclusion, aside from the proposed and as yetunadopted regulations. Absent specific statutory or regulatory authority,respondents argue that the Department may not impose an additional requirementthat a request for exclusion may not be granted absent government certification.Respondents state that even if subsidies have been received by companiesrequesting exclusion, the aggregate value of any subsidies is <T3>de minimis.</T3> Therefore, the exclusion requests should still begranted.<T3>DOC Position: See</T3> discussion under ``Exclusion Requests'' section.<T3>Comment 20:</T3> Respondents argue that the Department should terminateits investigation of EC-related loan benefits, because the Department didnot initiate a countervailing duty investigation specifically against importsof granite from the EC. They contend that the Department may not countervailsubsidies received from EC-affiliated organizations in a countervailingduty investigation involving merchandise from a single EC member state(<T3>i.e.,</T3> Italy), asserting that the investigation is limited strictlyto benefits provided by the GOI or subdivisions thereof. Respondents furtherargue that, because the Department calculates a single countervailing dutyrate applying to all imports of the subject merchandise from a given country,the Department must limit its investigation to subsidies provided by thecountry under investigation and its political subdivisions. Otherwise,respondent companies assert that if the Department were to find that certainbenefits provided by EC organizations confer countervailable subsidieson producers located in that member state, calculation of the subsidy ratebased only on the benefits received by companies located in that memberstate (as opposed to the EC as a whole) might be distorted.Petitioner argues that the Department has investigated and countervailedEC programs in several prior cases against specific EC member states, citingthe 1982 steel investigations involving Belgium, France, the Federal Republicof Germany, Italy, Luxembourg, the Netherlands, and the United Kingdom;and the 1985 table wine investigations involving France, the Federal Republicof Germany, and Italy. Because the EC is an ``association'' (within themeaning of 19 U.S.C. 1677(5) and 19 U.S.C. 1303(a)(1)) of member states,one of which is Italy, subsidies to Italy from the association may be countervailedunder the law.  <T3>DOC Position:</T3> It is true that the Department has countervailedEC programs in prior cases against specific EC member states. The mostrecent example of this is found in our <T3>Final Affirmative Countervailing Duty Determination: Certain FreshCut Flowers From the Netherlands,</T3> 52 FR 3301 (February 3, 1987) (<T3>Netherlands Flowers</T3>). There, as in previous cases, we examinedEC programs alleged by petitioner to provide subsidies to the subject merchandiseproduced in a specific member state. While petitioner in the current investigationdid not file an allegation of EC subsidies, we discovered the programsduring the course of verification and, after soliciting comments from theinterested parties, including the EC, we deemed it appropriate to examinethese programs. Section 771(3) of the Tariff Act of 1930, as amended (the Act) 19 U.S.C.1677(3) (1982) defines the term ``country'' as: ``a foreign country, apolitical subdivision, dependent territory, or possession of a foreigncountry, and, except for the purpose of antidumping proceedings, <T3>may include an association of two or more foreign countries,</T3> politicalsubdivisions, dependent territories, or possessions of countries into acustoms union outside the United States.'' (Emphasis added.) The EC isan association of two or more countries as provided for under section 771(3).The Department's general policy of calculating country-wide rates doesnot prohibit us from examining EC benefits in this investigation. Nor doesit mean that calculation of a subsidy rate based only on benefits receivedby companies located in a single member state (rather than the EC as awhole) would somehow be distorted. In <T3>Netherlands Flowers,</T3> we found a joint Government of the Netherlands(GON) and EC program, Aids for the Creation of Cooperative Organizations,to be countervailable. We took the benefit from both the EC and the GONto Dutch flower growers and allocated the total over sales of those sameflower growers. There is no distortion in a methodology which attributesbenefits, whether provided by the national or some other level government,to a specific company or industry in a specific country, and allocatesthose benefits over the sales of that specific company or industry to arriveat the subsidy rate. <T3>Comment 21:</T3> Petitioner asserts that there are three subsidiesavailable under the ECSC loan program: (1) The five percent interest rebateover five years; (2) the five-year grace period on the loans; and (3) theinterest rate on the loans. Petitioner therefore contends that the Departmentmust calculate the total subsidy value of the ECSC loan using all threesubsidy components. <T3>DOC Position:</T3> We agree with petitioner that the five percent interestrebate is countervailable; but, as discussed in Section I.B., we disagreethat any other aspect of the loans are countervailable with respect tocertain granite products. <T3>Comment 22:</T3> Petitioner argues that the ECSC conversion loan providedto one of the respondent companies is countervailable, because such loanstarget a specific enterprise or industry or group of enterprises or industries.Petitioner alleges that the loans are available only to firms which hireredundant coal and steel workers, and that they are given only in specificareas where there are steel mills or coal mines with redundant workers.Petitioner further alleges that the designation of ``priority areas'' makesthis a countervailable regional subsidy program. Finally, petitioner contendsthat the program is not used by a wide variety of industries throughoutthe EC. Petitioner further contends that these loans were found countervailablein <T3>Carbon Steel Products From Belgium</T3> (47 FR 39323) (1982) (<T3>Belgian Steel</T3>) and are not part of an EC-wide unemployment policy.Respondents argue that the ECSC loan provides no countervailable benefitbecause the loan (1) was provided as part of an EC-wide policy to relieveunemployment, and (2) was intended to benefit workers in the coal and steelindustry, not the granite industry. Respondents cite previous Departmentdeterminations in support of their contentions: In <T3>German Steel, supra,</T3> at 39349-50, the Department determined thata program that was part of a country-wide unemployment policy providedno countervailable subsidy despite the fact that certain areas receivedmore benefits under the program than did others. And in <T3>Groundfish From Canada,</T3> at 10066, the Department stated that the<T3>German Steel</T3> determination stands for the proposition that nocountervailable benefit is provided in those instances in which ``assistanceprovided as part of the national policy to relieve unemployment was providedon identical terms across [the investigated country],'' and ``regionaldesignations were merely for administrative convenience.'' <T3>DOC Position:</T3> As discussed in the verification report, ECSC conversionloans are available to an individual firm in any industry in any regionof a member state if the firm proposes a project that is capable of beingfilled by redundant ECSC workers. The loan can cover up to 50 percent ofthe investment costs. These loans have in fact been utilized by firms ina broad range of industries. They are also available to and have been approvedfor firms located in regions that are not considered to be coal and steelareas.In contrast, the interest rebate for certain ECSC loans is subject to regionalvariations based solely on location in particular regions. Because of itslocation in a ``priority'' region, Fratelli Guarda received interest rebatesthat would not have been available had the company been located outsidea ``priority'' region. As such, interest rebates on ECSC conversion loansare not provided on identical terms across all regions of EC member states,nor are the regional designations used merely for administrative convenience.<T3>Comment 23: </T3>Petitioner argues that the Department should allocatethe ECSC loan benefit over five years, because the interest rebate on theECSC loan is disbursed in ten bi-annual payments, beginning January 19,1986. Petitioner further argues that the Department should not use an allocationmethod at all, when the allocation method by itself causes a <T3>de minimis </T3>result. Otherwise the remedial effects of the countervailingduty law will have been made unavailable to the domestic industry.Respondents argue that, to the extent that the ECSC loan is determinedto confer a countervailable benefit, the Department should allocate thatbenefit over the ten-year life of the loan.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>These interest rebates are made only on a portionof the loan and are made as discreet, bi-annual cash payments over thefirst five years of a ten year loan. Therefore, we are expensing each suchpayment to the period of receipt, rather than allocating benefits overtime. In its accounts, Fratelli Guarda does not credit the rebates to interestpayable on the loan.<T3>Comment 24: </T3>Petitioner contends that EIB loans are still countervailable,as determined in <T3>Belgian Steel</T3>, because they are limited to specific ``unbalanced''regions in the EC. Petitioner further contends that loans from the EIB'sown funds and NCI loans should be treated as two distinct programs by theDepartment, arguing that they are separate programs even though both areadministered by the EIB. As support for this argument, petitioner citesthe fact that the EC created a separate fund when it first created theNCI in 1978, instead of just increasing the capitalization of the EIB inorder to increase lending. Petitioner contends that the Department hasexamined programs administered by the same organization or entity and determinedthat they constitute separate countervailable subsidies. Petitioner citesas examples the General Development Agreements and the Special RecoveryCapital Projects programs, <T3>Groundfish from Canada</T3> at 10048-49.Respondents contend that the countervailability of NCI loans is a matterof first impression for the Department. Respondents further contend thatthe prior finding on EIB loans in <T3>Belgian Steel</T3> has no precedential value in determining the countervailabilityof NCI loans.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>Because of our determination discussed in sectionIII.D., we have not reached this issue.<T3>Comment 25: </T3>Petitioner contends that regional location is a criterionfor the granting of both EIB and NCI loans, that the loans granted forone region are not ``interchangeable'' with those granted for another,and that the loans are made at rates inconsistent with commercial considerations.Petitioner further contends that ``few different companies actually receiveEIB and NCI loans'' and that there is no evidence to prove otherwise. Insupport of this argument, petitioner cites page 12 of the EC verificationreport, which lists several industries which EC officials state receivedEIB and NCI loans, but which does not provide a breakdown of companiesreceiving loans within each industry. For the program to be found not countervailable,there must be evidence on the record to refute petitioner's allegationthat the loans are provided to a specific group of industries, and thatoral statements by EC officials do not constitute verified evidence. Petitionercontends that ``there is no documentary evidence which supports statementsmade by EC officials,'' and that ``[t]he EC officials' statements seemto have been accepted at face value.''Respondent companies argue that the NCI financing received by certain respondentsprovides no countervailable benefit because such financing is available(1) to all regions of the EC and Italy, (2) to a broad range of industrialsectors, and (3) on commercial terms specified by the intermediary bankthat actually lends the funds to the ultimate borrower.<T3>DOC Position: </T3>Although documentation on the record is incompletedue to the previously noted time constraints and unusual circumstancesgoverning this aspect of our investigation, documentary evidence does exist.Among other documentation, we reviewed industry breakdowns published inannual reports and policies and procedures discussed in official publications.For the reasons discussed in Section III.D., we have decided that we shouldnot make a determination on NCI financing based on an incomplete record.<T3>Comment 26:</T3> Respondents contend that all EIB loans are availableonly for investment projects (<T3>i.e.,</T3> plant modernization or expansion, or the construction ofnew production facilities). They further contend that the EIB loan to GiuseppeFurrer (Furrer) provides no countervailable subsidy toward Furrer's graniteexports, because Furrer produces only marble.Petitioner argues that, since Furrer exports granite, its operations andfacilities are also involved with granite. Insofar as the company musttake possession of the granite at times, such that it is physically presentat the plant, and that company officials must process paperwork involvedin selling and shipping granite, petitioner argues that the benefit ofthis loan should be allocated to Furrer's total sales.<T3>DOC Position:</T3> Because of our determination discussed in SectionIII.D., we have not reached this issue. <T3>Comment 27:</T3> Petitioner contends that the Department collected``no useful data'' during verification regarding ECU-denominated loanswhose contracts show no financing from the ECSC or EIB. Absent such verifiedinformation, petitioner contends that the Department must determine thatthese loans are countervailable where they are provided at interest ratesand on terms inconsistent with commercial considerations. Petitioner arguesthat, according to information on the record, the Department found thatECU-denominated loans to the respondent companies are at interest ratesinconsistent with commercial considerations. Respondent companies argue that ECU-denominated loans were provided toseveral respondent companies entirely on commercial terms from commercialsources and without the involvement of the EIB or other EC-affiliated institutions.Respondents contend that ECUs are simply another type of currency in whichItalian companies may borrow. Respondents further contend that EC-relatedloans to the respondent companies did not confer any countervailable benefit.<T3>DOC Position:</T3> When we examine loan contracts and other documentationand see no evidence of government action or presence, we do not concludethat we lack verified information. In this investigation, we are relyingupon verified information to find that ECU-denominated loans that werenot disbursed through the ECSC or EIB involve no countervailable benefitsof any kind. We examined loan contracts, among other documentation, foreach loan and did not find any evidence that the EC or the GOI played anyrole in negotiating or specifying contractual terms for these loans. Incontrast, contracts for loans financed by the ECSC or the EIB specificallyidentify these institutions. We also established to our satisfaction thatcommercial banks in EC member states frequently lend in ECUs. Petitionerhas offered no information or documentation that contradicts our verifiedinformation. Finally, because interest payments on these loans are calculatedbased on ECUs, Italian lire interest rates are not the appropriate benchmarks.<T3>Comment 28:</T3> Petitioner asserts that its interests have been prejudicedby the acceptance of the GOI brief commenting on the Department's verificationof the government responses. This brief was filed on June 13, 1988, butpetitioner received it on June 17, 1988, one week after rebuttal briefswere due. Due to untimeliness, petitioner argues that the Department shouldnot consider this brief. Furthermore, petitioner objects to the ``latefiling'' by the GOI of eleven exhibits related to certification and tothe Department's procedures in (1) extending normal deadlines to accomodatethe GOI, and (2) not informing petitioner of the process. Petitioner statesthat the eleven exhibits must be rejected by the Department and that theDepartment should base its final determination regarding certificationon the ``properly noticed and conducted verification.''<T3>DOC Position:</T3> We allowed petitioner an extension of time to respondto the GOI brief of June 13, 1988. In so doing, we consider that any unfairnesswas eliminated in the briefing process. Petitioner filed its rebuttal tothe GOI brief on July 7, 1988. Therefore, we will not reject the GOI briefand have considered it in making our final determination. The eleven certification exhibits referred to by petitioner were submittedto the Department in Washington and were also reviewed by Department officialsin Rome. However, we did not formally accept these documents as verificationexhibits and did not take them into consideration in making our final determinationon the exclusion/certification issue. Our final determination on the exclusion/certificationissue is based solely on information reviewed and obtained during verificationin Italy in April 1988. <T3>Comment 29:</T3> Petitioner complains that it was disadvantaged bythe following: (1) Public exhibits to the EC verification report were suppliedto petitioner approximately five hours before initial comments were due;(2) the confidential version of the EC verification report was not providedto petitioner prior to the deadline for filing its initial comments; (3)confidential EC verification exhibits were not provided to petitioner;(4) the Department granted petitioner only 48 hours to comment on the ECverification report; and (5) respondents had access to ``substantiallymore'' information than petitioner. <T3>DOC Position:</T3> Petitioner had equal opportunity to comment andequal access to information as that afforded respondents. All parties wereaware that verification of the EC response occurred between June 29 andJuly 1, that the verification report was completed and sent to all partieson the first business day, July 5, following the end of verification, andthat the final determination, which could not be extended, was due approximatelyone a week later on July 13. Furthermore, petitioner was the first party to observe the public verificationexhibits. Release of the confidential version of the verification report,which contained only one sentence and several numbers that were not inthe public version and no substantive information not reported in the publicversion, was delayed for all parties except the EC. As it was, the EC didnot even file a brief, but chose to provide only factual corrections tothe report. In no respect did petitioner have access to less informationthan respondents. <ITAG tagnum="84">Verification </ITAG>In accordance with section 776(a) of the Act, except where noted in thisdetermination, we verified the information used in making our final determination.We followed the standard verification procedures including meeting withgovernment and company officials, examination of relevant accounting records,and examination of original source documents of the respondents. Our verificationresults are outlined in detail in the public versions of the verificationreports which are on file in the Central Records Unit (Room B-099) of theMain Commerce Building. <ITAG tagnum="84">ITC Notification </ITAG>In accordance with section 705(d) of the Act, we will notify the ITC ofour determination. Since we have determined that only <T3>de minimis</T3> countervailable benefits are being provided to manufacturers,producers or exporters in Italy of certain granite products, the investigationwill be terminated upon the publication of this notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Hence, the ITC is not required to make a finalinjury determination. This determination is published pursuant to section 705(d) of the Act (19U.S.C. 1671d(d)). <ITAG tagnum="20">July 13, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jan W. Mares, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Import Administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-16214 Filed 7-18-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3510-DS-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>